test/src/morphology/adj_umlaut_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
 
  Adjective - traeptsies: # ie-stamme
    traeptsies+A+Attr: [traeptsies,treaptjoeh]
    traeptsies+A+Sg+Nom: [traaptsan, treaptjan]
    traeptsies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    traeptsies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - saetnies: # ie-stamme
    saetnies+A+Attr: saetnies 
    saetnies+A+Sg+Nom: saatnan 
    saetnies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    saetnies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - suvhtjies: # ie-stamme
    suvhtjies+A+Attr: såvhtjan 
    suvhtjies+A+Sg+Nom: såvhtjan
    suvhtjies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    suvhtjies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - haerries: # ie-stamme
    haerries+A+Attr: haerries, 
    haerries+A+Sg+Nom: haarran 
    haerries+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    haerries+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - haeltjies: # ie-stamme
    haeltjies+A+Attr: haeltjies 
    haeltjies+A+Sg+Nom: haaltjan
    haeltjies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    haeltjies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - åehpies: # ie-stamme
    åehpies+A+Attr: åehpies 
    åehpies+A+Sg+Nom: åahpetje
    åehpies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [åahpatjåbpoe]
    åehpies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [åahpatjommes]

  Adjective - såebries: # ie-stamme
    såebries+A+Attr: såebries 
    såebries+A+Sg+Nom: såabran   
    såebries+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    såebries+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - suvhtjies: # ie-stamme
    suvhtjies+A+Attr: såvhtjan 
    suvhtjies+A+Sg+Nom: såvhtjan   
    suvhtjies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    suvhtjies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - pliejhkies: # ie-stamme
    pliejhkies+A+Attr: pliejhkies 
    pliejhkies+A+Sg+Nom: pleajhkan
    pliejhkies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    pliejhkies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - gijmies: # 
    gijmies+A+Attr: [gijmies, gæjmah, gæjmas, gæjmoeh, gæjmoes] 
    gijmies+A+Sg+Nom: [gæjman, gæjmoen, gæjma, gæjmoe]
    gijmies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    gijmies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - vilnjies: # ie-stamme
    vilnjies+A+Attr: vilnjies
    vilnjies+A+Sg+Nom: vælnjan 
    vilnjies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    vilnjies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - njerries: # ie-stamme
    njerries+A+Attr: njerries
    njerries+A+Sg+Nom: njarran 
    njerries+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    njerries+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - skiemtjies: # ie-stamme
    skiemtjies+A+Attr: skiemtjies
    skiemtjies+A+Sg+Nom: skeamtjan
    skiemtjies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    skiemtjies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - mujvies: # ie-stamme
    mujvies+A+Attr: mujvies
    mujvies+A+Sg+Nom: mujvie 
    mujvies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    mujvies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - hujnies: # ie-stamme
    hujnies+A+Attr: hujnies
    hujnies+A+Sg+Nom: [håjnan, håjna, håjnoe, hujnie]
    hujnies+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    hujnies+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - håjnoes: # ie-stamme
    håjnoes+A+Attr: håjnoes
    håjnoes+A+Sg+Nom: [håjnan, håjna, håjnoe, hujnie]
    håjnoes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    håjnoes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - håjnas: # ie-stamme
    håjnas+A+Attr: håjnas
    håjnas+A+Sg+Nom: [håjnan, håjnoen, håjna, håjnoe, hujnie]
    håjnas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    håjnas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - staeries: # 
    staeries+A+Attr: staeries
    staeries+A+Sg+Nom: staaran
    staeries+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    staeries+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - gieries: # ie-stamme
    gieries+A+Attr: gieries
    gieries+A+Sg+Nom: gearehke
    gieries+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gearahkåbpoe
    gieries+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gearahkommes

  Adjective - geehpes: # ie-stamme
    geehpes+A+Attr: [giehpies, geehpes]
    geehpes+A+Sg+Nom: [giehpies, giehpie, geehpes]
    geehpes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [giehpebe, geehpesåbpoe]
    geehpes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [geehpemes, giehpemes, geehpesommes]

  Adjective - sneehpes: # ie-stamme
    sneehpes+A+Attr: sneehpes
    sneehpes+A+Sg+Nom: sneehpes
    sneehpes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: sneehpebe
    sneehpes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sneehpemes

  Adjective - rööpses: # ie-stamme - ruopsis - ruoksat 
    rööpses+A+Attr: rööpses
    rööpses+A+Sg+Nom: rööpses
    rööpses+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: ruepsebe
    rööpses+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: rööpsemes

  Adjective - veelkes: # ie-stamme - vielkie
    veelkes+A+Attr: veelkes
    veelkes+A+Sg+Nom: veelkes
    veelkes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vielkebe
    veelkes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: veelkemes

  Adjective - kruana: # oe-stamme, eller ie-stamme-kruenebe -kruenie -
    kruana+A+Attr: kruana
    kruana+A+Sg+Nom: kruana
    kruana+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: kråanebe
    kruana+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: kråanemes

  Adjective - rïektes: # ie-stamme - riektiedidh
    rïektes+A+Attr: rïektes
    rïektes+A+Sg+Nom: reaktoe
    rïektes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    rïektes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - gabte: # ie-stamme - gebtie
    gabte+A+Attr: gabte
    gabte+A+Sg+Nom: gabte
    gabte+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [gebtebe, gabtebe]
    gabte+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [gebtemes, gabtemes]

  Adjective - gïsse: # ie-stamme
    gïsse+A+Attr: gïsse
    gïsse+A+Sg+Nom: gïsse
    gïsse+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [gïssebe, gissebe]
    gïsse+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [gïssemes, gissemes] 

  Adjective - nåake: # ie-stamme -nåekies
    nåake+A+Attr: nåake
    nåake+A+Sg+Nom: nåake
    nåake+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [nåakebe, vïerrebe, vearrebe]
    nåake+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [nåakemes, vïerremes, vearremes, veerremes]

  Adjective - onne: # ie-stamme - unnie
    onne+A+Attr: onne
    onne+A+Sg+Nom: onne
    onne+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [onnebe, unnebe]
    onne+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [onnemes, unnemes]

  Adjective - stoere: # ie-stamme - stuerie
    stoere+A+Attr: [stoerre, stoere]
    stoere+A+Sg+Nom: [stoerre, stoere]
    stoere+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [stoerebe, stuerebe]
    stoere+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [stoeremes, stööremes]

  Adjective - orre: # ie-stamme
    orre+A+Attr: orre
    orre+A+Sg+Nom: orre
    orre+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: urrebe
    orre+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: urremes

  Adjective - hijven: # ie-stamme
    hijven+A+Attr: hijven
    hijven+A+Sg+Nom: hijven
    hijven+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: buerebe
    hijven+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: bööremes

  Adjective - buerie: # ie-stamme
    buerie+A+Attr: buerie
    buerie+A+Sg+Nom: buerie
    buerie+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    buerie+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - sööjmes: # ie-stamme
    sööjmes+A+Attr: sööjmes
    sööjmes+A+Sg+Nom: sööjmes
    sööjmes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [suejmebe, sööjmebe]
    sööjmes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sööjmemes

  Adjective - söökes: # ie-stamme - suekie
    söökes+A+Attr: söökes
    söökes+A+Sg+Nom: söökes
    söökes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: suekebe
    söökes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: söökemes 

  Adjective - plaave: # ie-stamme - ?
    plaave+A+Attr: plaave
    plaave+A+Sg+Nom: [plaave, plaaves]
    plaave+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [plaevebe, plaavebe] # ?
    plaave+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: plaavemes

  Adjective - smaave: # ie-stamme 
    smaave+A+Attr: smaave
    smaave+A+Sg+Nom: smaave
    smaave+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [smaavebe, smaevebe] # ?
    smaave+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: smaavemes
